Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2112
Plan; submit to planning commission or board; recommendations.

(1) Prior to recommending a redevelopment plan to the governing body for approval, an authority shall submit such plan to the planning commission or board of the city in which the redevelopment project area is located for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the city as a whole. The planning commission or board shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed redevelopment plan to the authority within thirty days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission or board or, if no recommendations are received within such thirty days, then without such recommendations, an authority may recommend the redevelopment plan to the governing body of the city for approval.

(2) This section shall not apply to a redevelopment plan that receives an expedited review under section 18-2155.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 6(5), p. 805;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1612;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 8, p. 236;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2612;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 6.
November 14, 2020